Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.290

Court actions to implement.

In addition to any other remedy provided by law, the director in the name of the state shall have the right to sue in any court of competent jurisdiction for the recovery of any moneys due it from any persons subject to the provisions of this chapter and shall also have the right to institute suits in equity for injunctive relief and for purpose of enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 29.]